Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4917
Equivalent employees, defined.

Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by dividing the total hours paid in a year by the product of forty times the number of weeks in a year.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 17.